Maine, session 132, LD992.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA c. 239 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 239
FEE TRANSPARENCY
§1500-Z. Fee transparency
1. Definitions. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Mandatory fee" means a fee or charge required as part of the advertised price,
including, but not limited to, a resort fee, service charge or convenience fee.
B. "Short-term lodging" means an accommodation for transient occupancy in a hotel,
motel, vacation rental or similar establishment, typically for under 30 days.
C. "Ticket" has the same meaning as in Title 8, section 1301, subsection 1, paragraph
C.
2. Total price disclosure. A person advertising or offering for rent or renting a short-
term lodging or a person advertising or offering for sale or selling a ticket shall:
A. Clearly and conspicuously disclose the total price of the ticket or short-term lodging,
including any mandatory fee, whenever the price is advertised or displayed;
B. Display the total price of the ticket or short-term lodging more prominently than
other pricing information in all advertisements, offers or displays; and
C. Provide a complete itemization of the total price of the ticket or short-term lodging
that includes the nature, purpose and amount of any mandatory fee in a font size smaller
than that of the total price.
3. Prohibited practices. A person may not:
A. Misrepresent any fee or charge associated with a ticket or short-term lodging in any
advertisement, offer or display; or
B. Exclude a mandatory fee from the advertised price of a ticket or short-term lodging
without clearly and conspicuously disclosing the nature, purpose and amount of the
mandatory fee prior to a consumer's consenting to pay for the ticket or short-term
lodging.
4. Enforcement. The Attorney General shall enforce this section.
5. Private cause of action. A consumer harmed by a violation of this section may bring
an action in court against the person in violation of this section.
6. Violation. A person that violates this section is subject to treble damages and a
penalty not to exceed $5,000 per occurrence.
Page 1 - 132LR1503(01)